Utah statutes.
76-1-404.   Concurrent jurisdiction -- Prosecution in other jurisdiction
barring prosecution in state.
If a defendant's conduct establishes the commission of one or more offenses
within the concurrent jurisdiction of this state and of another jurisdiction,
federal or state, the prosecution in the other jurisdiction is a bar to a
subsequent prosecution in this state if (1) the former prosecution resulted in
an acquittal, conviction, or termination of prosecution, as those terms are
defined in Section 76-1-403, and (2) the subsequent prosecution is for the
same offense or offenses.
